Idaho, session 2026, S1290.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 5, Title 33, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 33-512E, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
33-512E. PUBLIC SCHOOL SOCIAL ACCESS PASS PROGRAM. (1) This section
shall be known and may be cited as the "Participation in Recreation Outside
of Matriculation Act" of the "PROM Act."
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Home school student" means any student in grades 8 through 12
who receives educational instruction outside of the public school
system in a home school. It does not include students who are en-
rolled in dual enrollment pursuant to the provisions of section
33-203, Idaho Code, or students who are enrolled in school dis-
trict or public charter school virtual education pursuant to the
provisions of section 33-1619 or 33-5202A, Idaho Code.
(b) "Public school" means either a traditional public school in a
public school district or a public charter school authorized pur-
suant to the provisions of chapter 52, title 33, Idaho Code.
(c) "School-sponsored social activities" means school-sanc-
tioned activities that are outside of or in addition to the regular
academic courses or curriculum of a public school, including but
not limited to dances, social events, arts and cultural events,
and college and career fairs.
(d) "Social access pass" means an identification credential that
allows a home school student to participate in school-sponsored
social activities as provided in this section.
(3) Starting in the 2026-2027 school year, home school students shall
be eligible to apply for a social access pass allowing them to participate in
school-sponsored social activities at one (1) public school located within
the attendance boundaries in which the student resides. The social access
pass is valid at only one (1) public school and can be used at only school-
sponsored social activities sanctioned by such school. Application for a
social access pass is strictly voluntary. Home school students may request a
social access pass from the respective public school and shall provide proof
of residency. A social access pass shall be valid for one (1) academic year.
(4) A public school may charge a fee to home school students for so-
cial access passes, not to exceed twenty-five dollars ($25.00), which is in-


tended to cover related costs. Such fee is separate from any other fee or
cost charged for admission to or participation in individual school-spon-
sored social activities. The public school shall not charge home school stu-
dents any additional fees beyond those applicable to enrolled students at-
tending the same school-sponsored social activity.
(5) Home school students using a social access pass shall have the same
privileges as all other students who participate in school-sponsored social
activities and shall follow activity rules and standards of behavior that
apply to all students participating in the activity. A public school shall
make all reasonable efforts to accommodate students utilizing social access
passes at school-sponsored social activities to ensure such students' abil-
ity to participate.
(6) No public school shall impose additional restrictions or limita-
tions regarding the social access pass beyond those established in this sec-
tion.
(7) Nothing in this section shall be construed to infringe on the right
of parents or legal guardians to educate their child outside of the public
school system. Participation in the social access pass program provided for
in this section shall not grant a public school any authority to regulate
or interfere with a student's home-based, nonpublic education and shall not
change or otherwise impact a home school student's status as a student edu-
cated outside of the public school system in a home school. Such participa-
tion shall not constitute any form of enrollment, whether full or partial, in
the public school system and shall not generate or trigger any state funding,
pupil funding, or average daily attendance credit for a school district.
(8) All student data collected by a public school pursuant to the pro-
visions of this section shall be used solely for the purposes of the pub-
lic school social access pass program and shall not be shared with any third
party except as provided for by law.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.